Hawaii statutes.
[§436B-14.8] Licensure;
acceptance of military education, training, or service. [Section
repealed June 30, 2022. L 2012, c 248, §4.] Notwithstanding any
law to the contrary, every licensing authority subject to this chapter, upon
presentation of satisfactory evidence by an applicant, shall consider relevant
education, training, or service completed by an individual as a member of the
armed forces or reserves of the United States, the National Guard of any state,
the military reserves of any state, or the navy militia of any state as part of
the evaluation process toward the qualification requirements to receive the
license. Evidence presented for consideration for fulfillment or partial
fulfillment of licensing requirements shall demonstrate substantial equivalency
to state standards. [L 2012, c 248, §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next